Alabama, session 2026rs, SB91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
term "multijurisdiction authority" means any entity created by
the Legislature, authorized to operate in more than one county
or municipality, created to address economic development
issues, whose governing body includes members appointed by
more than one county or municipality, and whose governing body
includes members appointed by the governing body of a county
that borders other states to the north and west.
(b) If a multijurisdiction authority does not have any
outstanding debt, the governing body of a county or
municipality, by resolution, may unilaterally withdraw from
Page 1

municipality, by resolution, may unilaterally withdraw from
SB91 Engrossed
the multijurisdiction authority.
(c) Following a withdrawal performed pursuant to
subsection (b), the governing body of a member county or
municipality, by resolution, may do any of the following:
(1) Establish an entity that operates within the
boundaries of the county or municipality and performs
functions similar to the multijurisdiction authority from
which the county or municipality withdrew. Any new entity
established pursuant to this subdivision shall have the power
to borrow money and to issue revenue bonds as evidence of
money borrowed.
(2) Further provide for the distribution or use of any
monies raised or collected inside the territory administered
by the governing body and previously distributed to the
multijurisdiction authority by the Legislature.
(d) Following a withdrawal performed pursuant to
subsection (b), the multijurisdiction authority shall remit to
the governing body of the withdrawing county or municipality a
portion of the multijurisdiction authority's unencumbered
monies that corresponds to the percentage of the
multijurisdiction authority's total funding that was raised or
collected from the territory of the withdrawing county or
municipality.
(e) Following a withdrawal performed pursuant to
subsection (b), the multijurisdiction authority shall have the
power to borrow money and to issue revenue bonds as evidence
of money borrowed.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB91 Engrossed


Senate
Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
to the Senate committee on County
and Municipal Government

Read for the second time and placed ................24-Feb-26
on the calendar:
0 amendments

Read for the third time and passed ................17-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 17
Nays 5
Abstains 0


Patrick Harris,
Secretary.

Page 3